Nevada, session 83, SB104-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 483.443 is hereby amended to read as follows:
483.443 1. The Department shall, upon receiving notification
from a district attorney or other public agency collecting support for
children pursuant to NRS 425.510 that a court has determined that a
person:
(a) Has failed to comply with a subpoena or warrant relating to a
proceeding to establish paternity or to establish or enforce an
obligation for the support of a child; or
(b) Is in arrears in the payment for the support of one or more
children,
 send a written notice to that person that his or her driver’s license
is subject to suspension.
2. The notice must include:
(a) The reason for the suspension of the license;
(b) The information set forth in subsections 3, 5 and 6; and
(c) Any other information the Department deems necessary.
3. If a person who receives a notice pursuant to subsection 1
does not, within 30 days after receiving the notice, comply with the
subpoena or warrant or satisfy the arrearage as required in NRS
425.510, the Department shall suspend the license without providing
the person with an opportunity for a hearing.
4. The Department shall suspend immediately the license of a
defendant if so ordered pursuant to NRS 62B.420 . [or 484A.7047.]
-
*SB104_R3*

– 5 –
5. The Department shall reinstate the driver’s license of a
person whose license was suspended pursuant to this section if it
receives:
(a) A notice from : [any of the following:]
(1) The district attorney or other public agency pursuant to
NRS 425.510 that the person has complied with the subpoena or
warrant or has satisfied the arrearage pursuant to that section ; [.]
(2) A traffic commissioner, referee, hearing master,
municipal judge, justice of the peace or district judge, as applicable
[, that a delinquency for which the suspension was ordered pursuant
to NRS 484A.7047 has been discharged.] ; or
(3) A judge of the juvenile court that an unsatisfied civil
judgment for which the suspension was ordered pursuant to NRS
62B.420 has been satisfied; and
(b) Payment of the fee for reinstatement of a suspended license
prescribed in NRS 483.410.
6. The Department shall not require a person whose driver’s
license was suspended pursuant to this section to submit to the tests
and other requirements which are adopted by regulation pursuant to
subsection 1 of NRS 483.495 as a condition of the reinstatement of
the license.
Sec. 1.2. NRS 484A.615 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
484A.615 1. A court having jurisdiction over an offense for
which a traffic citation must be issued pursuant to NRS 484A.630 or
that is punishable as a civil infraction pursuant to NRS 484A.703 to
484A.705, inclusive, or its traffic violations bureau may establish a
system by which, except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, the
court or traffic violations bureau may allow:
(a) A person who has been issued a traffic citation or a civil
infraction citation that is filed with the court or traffic violations
bureau to perform certain actions approved by the court or traffic
violations bureau, including, without limitation, to make a plea and
state his or her defense or, if authorized, any mitigating
circumstances, by mail, by electronic mail, over the Internet or by
other electronic means.
(b) A peace officer who issued a civil infraction citation to a
person or, if the provisions of NRS 484A.7049 apply, a peace
officer who halted a person, to perform certain actions approved by
the court or traffic violations bureau, including, without limitation,
to submit a written statement under oath by mail, by electronic mail,
over the Internet or by other electronic means in lieu of his or her
personal appearance at the hearing held pursuant to NRS 484A.7041
to contest the determination that the person who has been issued the
civil infraction citation committed a civil infraction.
-
*SB104_R3*

– 6 –
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, if a court or
traffic violations bureau has established a system pursuant to
subsection 1, the court or traffic violations bureau may allow:
(a) A person described in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 to use
the system to perform certain actions approved by the court or
traffic violations bureau, including, without limitation, to make a
plea or state his or her defense or, if authorized, any mitigating
circumstances in lieu of making a plea and statement of his or her
defense or any mitigating circumstances in court.
(b) A peace officer described in paragraph (b) of subsection 1 to
use the system to perform certain actions approved by the court or
traffic violations bureau, including, without limitation, to submit a
written statement under oath in lieu of making a personal
appearance in court.
3. Any plea or statement submitted through the system by a
person or peace officer pursuant to subsection 2 must be received by
the court before the date on which the person is required to appear in
court pursuant to the traffic citation or civil infraction citation.
4. If a court or traffic violations bureau allows an eligible
person to whom a traffic citation or civil infraction citation is issued
to use a system established pursuant to subsection 1 to make a plea
and state his or her defense or, if authorized, any mitigating
circumstances and the person chooses to make a plea and state his or
her defense or any mitigating circumstances by using such a system,
the person waives any relevant constitutional right, including,
without limitation, the right to a trial, the right to confront any
witnesses and the right to counsel, as applicable.
5. Any system established pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) For the purpose of authenticating that the person making the
plea and statement of his or her defense or any mitigating
circumstances or performing any other approved action is the person
to whom the traffic citation or civil infraction citation was issued, be
capable of requiring the person to submit any of the following
information, as applicable, at the discretion of the court or traffic
violations bureau:
(1) The traffic citation number or civil infraction citation
number;
(2) The name and address of the person;
(3) The state registration number of the [person’s] vehicle [,]
the person was driving when the traffic citation or civil infraction
citation was issued, if any;
(4) The number of the driver’s license of the person, if any;
(5) The offense charged or the civil infraction for which the
citation was issued; and
-
*SB104_R3*

– 7 –
(6) Any other information required by any rules adopted by
the Nevada Supreme Court pursuant to subsection 7.
(b) For the purposes of authenticating that the peace officer
submitting the written statement or performing any other approved
action is the peace officer who issued the civil infraction citation, be
capable of requiring the peace officer to submit any of the following
information at the discretion of the court or traffic violations bureau:
(1) The civil infraction citation number;
(2) The civil infraction for which the citation was issued; and
(3) The first initial, last name and personnel number of the
peace officer.
(c) Provide notice to each person who uses the system to make a
plea and statement of his or her defense or any mitigating
circumstances that the person waives any relevant constitutional
right, including, without limitation, the right to a trial, the right to
confront any witnesses and the right to counsel, as applicable.
(d) If a plea and statement of the defense or mitigating
circumstances of a person or a written statement of a peace officer is
submitted by electronic mail, over the Internet or by other electronic
means:
(1) Confirm receipt of:
(I) The plea and statement to the person making the plea;
and
(II) The written statement to the peace officer; or
(2) Make available to:
(I) The person making the plea a copy of the plea and
statement; and
(II) The peace officer submitting the written statement a
copy of the written statement.
6. A person who has been issued a traffic citation for any of the
following offenses may not make a plea and state his or her defense
or any mitigating circumstances by using a system established
pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) Aggressive driving in violation of NRS 484B.650;
(b) Reckless driving in violation of NRS 484B.653;
(c) Vehicular manslaughter in violation of NRS 484B.657; or
(d) Driving, operating or being in actual physical control of a
vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a
controlled substance in violation of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120, as
applicable.
7. The Nevada Supreme Court may adopt rules not inconsistent
with the laws of this State to carry out the provisions of this section.
-
*SB104_R3*

– 8 –
Sec. 1.3. NRS 484A.630 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
484A.630 1. Whenever a person is halted by a peace officer
for any violation of chapters 484A to 484E, inclusive, of NRS and is
not taken before a magistrate as required or permitted by NRS
484A.720 and 484A.730, the peace officer must prepare a traffic
citation manually or electronically in the form of a complaint
issuing in the name of “The State of Nevada,” containing a notice to
appear in court, the name and address of the person, the state
registration number of the [person’s] vehicle [,] the person was
driving when the citation was issued, if any, the number of the
person’s driver’s license, if any, the offense charged, including a
brief description of the offense and the NRS citation, the time and
place when and where the person is required to appear in court, and
such other pertinent information as may be necessary. The peace
officer may also request, and the person may provide, the electronic
mail address and mobile telephone number of the person for the
purpose of enabling the court in which the person is required to
appear to communicate with the person. If the peace officer requests
such information, the peace officer shall expressly inform the person
that providing such information is voluntary and, if the person
provides such information, the person thereby gives his or her
consent for the court to communicate with the person through such
means. The peace officer shall sign the citation and deliver a copy of
the citation to the person charged with the violation. If the citation is
prepared electronically, the peace officer shall sign the copy of the
citation that is delivered to the person charged with the violation.
2. The time specified in the notice to appear must be at least 5
days after the alleged violation.
3. The place specified in the notice to appear must be before a
magistrate, as designated in NRS 484A.750.
4. The person charged with the violation may give his or her
written promise to appear in court by signing or physically receiving
at least one copy of the traffic citation prepared by the peace officer
and thereupon the peace officer shall not take the person into
physical custody for the violation. If the citation is prepared
electronically, the peace officer shall indicate on the electronic
record of the citation whether the person charged gave his or her
written promise to appear. A copy of the citation that is signed by
the person charged or the electronic record of the citation which
indicates that the person charged gave his or her written promise to
appear suffices as proof of service.
5. If the person charged with the violation refuses to sign a
copy of the traffic citation but physically receives a copy of the
citation delivered by the peace officer:
-
*SB104_R3*

– 9 –
(a) The receipt shall be deemed personal service of the notice to
appear in court;
(b) A copy of the citation signed by the peace officer suffices as
proof of service; and
(c) The peace officer shall not take the person into physical
custody for the violation.
Sec. 1.4. NRS 484A.7035 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
484A.7035 1. When a person is halted by a peace officer in
this State for any violation of chapters 483 to 484E, inclusive, 486
or 490 of NRS that is a civil infraction, or, if authorized by a traffic
enforcement agency pursuant to NRS 484A.7049, for a violation
of certain such provisions that is punishable as a misdemeanor, or
a prosecuting attorney elects to treat a violation of chapters 483 to
484E, inclusive, 486 or 490 of NRS that is punishable as a
misdemeanor instead as a civil infraction in accordance with NRS
484A.7049, the peace officer or prosecuting attorney, as applicable,
may prepare a civil infraction citation manually or electronically in
the form of a complaint issuing in the name of “The State of
Nevada,” containing : [, except as otherwise provided in paragraph
(a) of subsection 2 of NRS 484A.7049:]
(a) A statement that the citation represents a determination by a
peace officer or prosecuting attorney that a civil infraction has been
committed by the person named in the citation and that the
determination will be final unless contested as provided in NRS
484A.703 to 484A.705, inclusive;
(b) A statement that a civil infraction is not a criminal offense;
(c) The name, date of birth, residential address and mailing
address, if different from the residential address, telephone number
and electronic mail address of the person who is being issued the
citation and an indication as to whether the person has agreed to
receive communications relating to the civil infraction by text
message;
(d) The state registration number of the [person’s] vehicle [,] the
person was driving when the citation was issued, if any;
(e) The number of the person’s driver’s license, if any;
(f) The civil infraction for which the citation was issued;
(g) The personnel number or other unique agency identification
number of the peace officer issuing the citation [and the address and
phone number of the agency which employs the peace officer] or, if
a prosecuting attorney is issuing the citation, the personnel number
or other unique agency identification number of the peace officer
who halted the person for the violation or the volunteer appointed
pursuant to NRS 484B.470 who issued the citation [and the address
-
*SB104_R3*

– 10 –
and phone number of the agency which employs the peace officer or
volunteer,] preprinted or printed legibly on the citation;
(h) A statement of the options provided pursuant to NRS
484A.703 to 484A.705, inclusive, for responding to the citation and
the procedures necessary to exercise these options;
(i) A statement that, at any hearing to contest the determination
set forth in the citation, the facts that constitute the infraction must
be proved by a preponderance of the evidence and the person may
subpoena witnesses, including, without limitation, the peace officer
or duly authorized member or volunteer of a traffic enforcement
agency who issued the citation or halted the person; and
(j) A statement that the person must respond to the citation as
provided in NRS 484A.703 to 484A.705, inclusive, within 90
calendar days [.] after the date on which the citation is issued or
filed with the court, whichever is later.
2. The peace officer may also request, and the person may
provide, the electronic mail address and mobile telephone number
of the person for the purpose of enabling the court in which the
person is required to appear to communicate with the person. If
the peace officer requests such information, the peace officer shall
expressly inform the person that providing such information is
voluntary and, if the person provides such information, the person
thereby gives his or her consent for the court to communicate with
the person through such means.
3. A peace officer who issues a civil infraction citation
pursuant to subsection 1 shall sign the citation and deliver a copy of
the citation to the person charged with the civil infraction. If the
citation is prepared electronically, the peace officer shall sign the
copy of the citation that is delivered to the person charged with
the violation.
[3.] 4. A civil infraction citation may be served by delivering a
copy of the citation to the person charged with the civil infraction
pursuant to this section or NRS 484A.7049. The acceptance of a
civil infraction citation by the person charged with the civil
infraction shall be deemed personal service of the citation and a
copy of the citation signed by the peace officer or prosecuting
attorney, as applicable, constitutes proof of service. If a person
charged with a civil infraction refuses to accept a civil infraction
citation, the copy of the citation signed by the peace officer or
prosecuting attorney, as applicable, constitutes proof of service.
Sec. 1.6. NRS 484A.704 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
484A.704 1. Any person who receives a civil infraction
citation pursuant to NRS 484A.7035 or 484A.7049 shall respond to
the citation as provided in this section not later than 90 calendar
-
*SB104_R3*

– 11 –
days after the date on which the citation is issued [.] or filed with
the court, whichever is later.
2. If a person receiving a civil infraction citation does not
contest the determination that the person has committed the civil
infraction set forth in the citation, the person must respond to the
citation by indicating that the person does not contest the
determination and submitting [full] in person, by mail or through
the Internet or other electronic means:
(a) Full payment of the monetary penalty, the administrative
assessment and any fees to the court specified in the citation, or its
traffic violations bureau [, in person, by mail or through the Internet
or other electronic means.] ; or
(b) A request that the court waive or reduce the monetary
penalty or enter into a payment plan with the person, if the person
believes that full payment of the monetary penalty and
administrative assessment is excessive in relation to his or her
financial resources or is not within his or her present financial
ability to pay. Such a request must include any supporting
documentation.
3. If a person receiving a civil infraction citation wishes to
contest the determination that the person has committed the civil
infraction set forth in the citation, the person must respond by
requesting in person, by mail or through the Internet or other
electronic means a hearing for that purpose. The court shall notify
the person in writing of the time, place and date of the hearing,
but the date of the hearing must not be earlier than 9 calendar days
after the court provides notice of the hearing.
4. Except as otherwise provided in [this] subsection [,] 5, not
less than 30 days before the deadline for a person to respond to a
civil infraction citation, the court must send to the address or
electronic mail address of the person, as indicated on the civil
infraction citation issued to the person [, a] :
(a) A reminder that the person must respond to the civil
infraction citation within 90 calendar days after the date on which
the civil infraction citation is issued [.] or filed with the court,
whichever is later; and
(b) If the court has established an online program of dispute
resolution, notice of the availability of the program and
instructions for participation in the program.
5. If the person agreed to receive communications relating to
the civil infraction by text message, the court may send [such a] the
notice required by subsection 4 to the telephone number of the
person as indicated on the civil infraction citation.
6. If the person does not respond to the civil infraction citation
in the manner specified by subsection 2 or 3 within 90 calendar days
-
*SB104_R3*

– 12 –
after the date on which the civil infraction citation is issued [,] or
filed with the court, whichever is later, the court must enter an
order pursuant to NRS 484A.7043 finding that the person
committed the civil infraction and assessing the monetary penalty
and administrative assessments prescribed for the civil infraction. A
person who has been issued a civil infraction citation and who fails
to respond to the civil infraction citation as required by this section
may not appeal an order entered pursuant to this section.
[5.] 7. If any person issued a civil infraction citation fails to
appear at a hearing requested pursuant to subsection 3, the court
must enter an order pursuant to NRS 484A.7043 finding that the
person committed the civil infraction and assessing the monetary
penalty and administrative assessments prescribed for the civil
infraction. A person who has been issued a civil infraction citation
and who fails to appear at a hearing requested pursuant to subsection
3 may not appeal an order entered pursuant to this subsection.
[6.] 8. In addition to any other penalty imposed, any person
who is found by the court to have committed a civil infraction
pursuant to subsection [5] 7 shall pay the witness fees, per diem
allowances, travel expenses and other reimbursement in accordance
with NRS 50.225.
[7.] 9. If a court has established a system pursuant to NRS
484A.615, any person issued a civil infraction citation may, if
authorized by the court, use the system to perform any applicable
actions pursuant to this section.
Sec. 1.7. NRS 484A.7041 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
484A.7041 1. If, pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 484A.704,
a person receiving a civil infraction citation requests a hearing to
contest the determination that the person has committed the civil
infraction set forth in the citation, the hearing must be conducted in
accordance with this section.
2. [Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, before a
hearing to contest the determination that a person has committed a
civil infraction, the court shall require the person to post a bond
equal to the amount of the full payment of the monetary penalty, the
administrative assessment and any fees specified in the civil
infraction citation. In lieu of posting such a bond, the person may
instead deposit cash with the court in the amount of the bond
required pursuant to this subsection. Any bond posted or cash
deposited with the court pursuant to this subsection must be
forfeited upon the court’s finding that the person committed the civil
infraction. Any person whom the court determines is unable to pay
the costs of defending the action or is a client of a program for legal
aid in accordance with NRS 12.015 must not be required to post a
-
*SB104_R3*

– 13 –
bond or deposit cash with the court in accordance with this
subsection.
3.] The person who requested the hearing may, at his or her
expense, be represented by counsel, and a city attorney or district
attorney, in his or her discretion and as applicable, may represent the
plaintiff.
[4.] 3. A hearing conducted pursuant to this section must be
conducted by the court without a jury. In lieu of the personal
appearance at the hearing by the peace officer who issued the civil
infraction citation, the court may consider the information contained
in the civil infraction citation and any other written statement
submitted under oath by the peace officer. If the court has
established a system pursuant to NRS 484A.615, the peace officer
may, if authorized by the court, use the system to submit such a
statement. The person named in the civil infraction citation may
subpoena witnesses, including, without limitation, the peace officer
who issued the citation, and has the right to present evidence and
examine witnesses present in court.
[5.] 4. After consideration of the evidence and argument, the
court shall determine whether a civil infraction was committed by
the person named in the civil infraction citation. The court must find
by a preponderance of the evidence that the person named in the
civil infraction citation committed a civil infraction. If it has not
been established by a preponderance of the evidence that the
infraction was committed by the person named in the citation, the
court must enter an order dismissing the civil infraction citation in
the court’s records. If it has been established by a preponderance of
the evidence that the infraction was committed, the court must enter
in the court’s records an order pursuant to NRS 484A.7043.
[6.] 5. An appeal from the court’s determination or order may
be taken in the same manner as any other civil appeal from a
municipal court or justice court, as applicable, except that:
(a) The notice of appeal must be filed not later than 7 calendar
days after the court enters in the court’s records an order pursuant to
NRS 484A.7043;
(b) If the appellant is the person charged with the civil
infraction, any bond required to be given by the appellant in order to
secure a stay of execution of the order of the court during the
pendency of the appeal must equal the amount of the monetary
penalty and administrative assessments which the court has ordered
the appellant to pay pursuant to NRS 484A.7043. Any bond must be
forfeited if the order of the court is affirmed on appeal; and
(c) If a prosecuting attorney does not represent the plaintiff
during the proceedings in the justice court or municipal court, the
-
*SB104_R3*

– 14 –
appellate court shall review the record and any arguments presented
by the person charged with the civil infraction and render a decision.
Sec. 1.8. NRS 484A.7043 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
484A.7043 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
person who is found to have committed a civil infraction shall be
punished by a civil penalty of not more than $500 per violation
unless a greater civil penalty is authorized by specific statute.
Except as otherwise provided in NRS 484A.792, any civil penalty
collected pursuant to NRS 484A.703 to 484A.705, inclusive, must
be paid to:
(a) The treasurer of the city in which the civil infraction
[occurred;] citation was filed; or
(b) If the civil infraction did not occur in a city, the treasurer of
the county in which the civil infraction [occurred.] citation was
filed.
2. If a person is found to have committed a civil infraction, in
addition to any civil penalty imposed on the person, the court shall
order the person to pay the administrative assessments set forth in
NRS 176.059, 176.0611, 176.0613 and 176.0623 in the amount that
the person would be required to pay if the civil penalty were a fine
imposed on a defendant who pleads guilty or guilty but mentally ill
or is found guilty or guilty but mentally ill of a misdemeanor. If, in
lieu of a civil penalty, the court authorizes a person to successfully
complete a course of traffic safety approved by the Department of
Motor Vehicles, the court must order the person to pay the amount
of the administrative assessment that corresponds to the civil penalty
for which the defendant would have otherwise been responsible.
The administrative assessments imposed pursuant to this subsection
must be collected and distributed in the same manner as the
administrative assessments imposed and collected pursuant to NRS
176.059, 176.0611, 176.0613 and 176.0623.
3. If the court determines that a civil penalty or administrative
assessment specified in the civil infraction citation or imposed
pursuant to this section is:
(a) Excessive in relation to the financial resources of the
defendant, the court may waive or reduce the monetary penalty
accordingly.
(b) Not within the defendant’s present financial ability to pay,
the court may enter into a payment plan with the person.
4. A court having jurisdiction over a civil infraction pursuant to
NRS 484A.703 to 484A.705, inclusive, may:
(a) In addition to ordering a person who is found to have
committed a civil infraction to pay a civil penalty and administrative
assessments pursuant to this section, order the person to successfully
-
*SB104_R3*

– 15 –
complete a course of traffic safety approved by the Department of
Motor Vehicles.
(b) Waive or reduce the civil penalty that a person who is found
to have committed a civil infraction would otherwise be required to
pay if the court determines that any circumstances warrant such a
waiver or reduction.
(c) Reduce any moving violation for which a person was issued
a civil infraction citation to a nonmoving violation if the court
determines that any circumstances warrant such a reduction.
5. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a
court having jurisdiction over a civil infraction pursuant to NRS
484A.703 to 484A.705, inclusive, to hold a hearing before
reducing a moving violation for which a person was issued a civil
infraction citation to a nonmoving violation.
Sec. 2. NRS 484A.7047 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484A.7047 1. If a civil penalty, administrative assessment or
fee is imposed upon a person who is found to have committed a civil
infraction pursuant to NRS 484A.703 to 484A.705, inclusive,
whether or not the civil penalty, administrative assessment or fee is
in addition to any other punishment, and the civil penalty,
administrative assessment or fee or any part of it remains unpaid
after the time established by the court for its payment, the
delinquent person is liable for a collection fee, to be imposed by the
court at the time it finds that the civil penalty, administrative
assessment or fee is delinquent, of:
(a) Not more than $100, if the amount of the delinquency is less
than $2,000.
(b) Not more than $500, if the amount of the delinquency is
$2,000 or greater, but is less than $5,000.
(c) Ten percent of the amount of the delinquency, if the amount
of the delinquency is $5,000 or greater.
2. The city or county that is responsible for collecting a
delinquent civil penalty, administrative assessment or fee may, in
addition to attempting to collect the delinquent amounts through any
other lawful means, contract with a collection agency licensed
pursuant to NRS 649.075 to collect the delinquent amounts owed by
a person who is found to have committed a civil infraction. The
collection agency must be paid as compensation for its services an
amount not greater than the amount of the collection fee imposed
pursuant to subsection 1 in accordance with the provisions of the
contract.
3. If a court finds that a person committed a civil infraction, the
civil penalty, administrative assessments and fees prescribed for the
civil infraction may be enforced in the manner provided by law for
the enforcement of a judgment for money rendered in a civil action
-
*SB104_R3*

– 16 –
except that the judgment and any lien for the judgment expires 10
years after the date the judgment was docketed and may not be
renewed. The court may [:
(a) Request] request that the city or county in which the court
has jurisdiction undertake collection of the delinquency, including,
without limitation, the original amount of the civil judgment entered
pursuant to this subsection and the collection fee, by attachment or
garnishment of the property, wages or other money receivable of the
delinquent person.
[(b) Order the suspension of the driver’s license of the
delinquent person. If the delinquent person does not possess a
driver’s license, the court may prohibit him or her from applying for
a driver’s license for a specified period. If the delinquent person is
already the subject of a court order suspending or delaying the
issuance of his or her driver’s license, the court may order the
additional suspension or delay, as appropriate, to apply
consecutively with the previous order. At the time the court issues
an order pursuant to this paragraph suspending the driver’s license
of a delinquent person or delaying the ability of a delinquent person
to apply for a driver’s license, the court shall, within 5 days after
issuing the order, forward to the Department a copy of the order.
The Department shall report a suspension pursuant to this paragraph
to an insurance company or its agent inquiring about the delinquent
person’s driving record, but such a suspension must not be
considered for the purpose of rating or underwriting.]
4. Money collected from a collection fee imposed pursuant to
subsection 1 must be distributed in the following manner:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (c), if the money
is collected by or on behalf of a municipal court, the money must be
deposited in a special fund in the appropriate city treasury. The city
may use the money in the fund only to develop and implement a
program for the collection of civil penalties, administrative
assessments and fees and to hire additional personnel necessary for
the success of such a program.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (c), if the money
is collected by or on behalf of a justice court, the money must be
deposited in a special fund in the appropriate county treasury. The
county may use the money in the special fund only to:
(1) Develop and implement a program for the collection of
civil penalties, administrative assessments and fees and to hire
additional personnel necessary for the success of such a program; or
(2) Improve the operations of a court by providing funding
for:
(I) A civil law self-help center; or
-
*SB104_R3*

– 17 –
(II) Court security personnel and equipment for a regional
justice center that includes the justice courts of that county.
(c) If the money is collected by a collection agency, after the
collection agency has been paid its fee pursuant to the terms of the
contract, any remaining money must be deposited in the state, city
or county treasury, whichever is appropriate, to be used only for the
purposes set forth in paragraph (a) or (b).
Sec. 2.2. NRS 484A.7049 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
484A.7049 1. A prosecuting attorney may , at any time
before a court having jurisdiction over the alleged offense enters a
judgment of conviction against a defendant, elect to treat a
violation of a provision of chapters 483 to 484E, inclusive, 486 or
490 of NRS that is punishable as a misdemeanor, other than a
violation of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120, as a civil infraction
pursuant to NRS 484A.703 to 484A.705, inclusive.
2. The [prosecuting attorney shall make the election described
in subsection 1 on or before the time scheduled for the first
appearance of the defendant by:
(a) Preparing a civil infraction citation in accordance with
subsection 1 of NRS 484A.7035 that contains all applicable
information that is known to the prosecuting attorney, signing the
citation and filing the citation with a court having jurisdiction over
the alleged offense or with its traffic violations bureau;
(b) Filing notice of the prosecuting attorney’s election with the
court having jurisdiction of the underlying criminal charge; and
(c) Delivering a copy of the notice and citation to the defendant.
3. Upon the filing of a notice pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 2, the court shall dismiss the underlying criminal charge.]
district attorney or city attorney of any county or city, respectively,
may authorize a traffic enforcement agency over whom the district
attorney or city attorney, as applicable, has jurisdiction to elect to
treat a violation of a provision of chapters 483 to 484E, inclusive,
486 or 490 of NRS that is punishable as a misdemeanor, other
than a violation of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120, as a civil
infraction pursuant to NRS 484A.703 to 484A.705, inclusive. If so
authorized, a traffic enforcement agency may authorize a peace
officer employed by the agency to treat a violation of such
provisions as a civil infraction pursuant to NRS 484A.703 to
484A.705, inclusive.
3. A bench warrant may not be issued for a violation treated
as a civil infraction pursuant to this section.
-
*SB104_R3*

– 18 –
Sec. 2.4. NRS 484A.705 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
484A.705 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a
person commits a violation of a provision of chapters 483 to 484E,
inclusive, 486 or 490 of NRS that is punishable as a civil infraction
while the person is under the influence of alcohol or a controlled
substance, the person may [instead] be [charged] :
1. Charged with a misdemeanor [.] ; and
2. Arrested, if authorized pursuant to NRS 484A.710.
Sec. 2.6. NRS 484A.710 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
484A.710 1. Any peace officer may, without a warrant, arrest
a person if the officer has reasonable cause for believing that the
person has committed [any] :
(a) Any of the following offenses:
[(a)] (1) Homicide by vehicle;
[(b)] (2) A violation of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120;
[(c)] (3) A violation of NRS 484C.430;
[(d)] (4) A violation of NRS 484C.130;
[(e)] (5) Failure to stop, give information or render reasonable
assistance in the event of a crash resulting in death or personal
injuries in violation of NRS 484E.010 or 484E.030;
[(f)] (6) Failure to stop or give information in the event of a
crash resulting in damage to a vehicle or to other property legally
upon or adjacent to a highway in violation of NRS 484E.020 or
484E.040;
[(g)] (7) Reckless driving;
[(h)] (8) Driving a motor vehicle on a highway or on premises to
which the public has access at a time when the person’s driver’s
license has been cancelled, revoked or suspended; or
[(i)] (9) Driving a motor vehicle in any manner in violation of
the restrictions imposed in a restricted license issued to the person
pursuant to NRS 483.490.
(b) An offense that is punishable as a civil infraction, if the
officer has reasonable cause for believing that the person has
committed an offense listed in paragraph (a).
2. Whenever any person is arrested as authorized in this
section, the person must be taken without unnecessary delay before
the proper magistrate as specified in NRS 484A.750.
Sec. 2.65. NRS 484A.760 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
484A.760 Whenever any person is taken into custody by a
peace officer for the purpose of taking him or her before a
magistrate or court as authorized or required in chapters 484A to
484E, inclusive, of NRS upon any charge other than a felony or the
-
*SB104_R3*

– 19 –
offenses enumerated in [paragraphs (a) to (e),] subparagraphs (1) to
(5), inclusive, of paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 484A.710,
and no magistrate is available at the time of arrest, and there is no
bail schedule established by the magistrate or court and no lawfully
designated court clerk or other public officer who is available and
authorized to accept bail upon behalf of the magistrate or court, the
person must be released from custody upon the issuance to the
person of a misdemeanor citation or traffic citation and the person
signing a promise to appear, as provided in NRS 171.1773 or
484A.630, respectively, or physically receiving a copy of the traffic
citation, as provided in NRS 484A.630.
Sec. 2.67. NRS 4.370 is hereby amended to read as follows:
4.370 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, justice
courts have jurisdiction of the following civil actions and
proceedings and no others except as otherwise provided by specific
statute:
(a) In actions arising on contract for the recovery of money only,
if the sum claimed, exclusive of interest, does not exceed $15,000.
(b) In actions for damages for injury to the person, or for taking,
detaining or injuring personal property, or for injury to real property
where no issue is raised by the verified answer of the defendant
involving the title to or boundaries of the real property, if the
damage claimed does not exceed $15,000.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (l), in actions for
a fine, penalty or forfeiture not exceeding $15,000, given by statute
or the ordinance of a county, city or town, where no issue is raised
by the answer involving the legality of any tax, impost, assessment,
toll or municipal fine.
(d) In actions upon bonds or undertakings conditioned for the
payment of money, if the sum claimed does not exceed $15,000,
though the penalty may exceed that sum. Bail bonds and other
undertakings posted in criminal matters may be forfeited regardless
of amount.
(e) In actions to recover the possession of personal property, if
the value of the property does not exceed $15,000.
(f) To take and enter judgment on the confession of a defendant,
when the amount confessed, exclusive of interest, does not exceed
$15,000.
(g) Of actions for the possession of lands and tenements where
the relation of landlord and tenant exists, when damages claimed do
not exceed $15,000 or when no damages are claimed.
(h) Of actions when the possession of lands and tenements has
been unlawfully or fraudulently obtained or withheld, when
damages claimed do not exceed $15,000 or when no damages are
claimed.
-
*SB104_R3*

– 20 –
(i) Of suits for the collection of taxes, where the amount of the
tax sued for does not exceed $15,000.
(j) Of actions for the enforcement of mechanics’ liens, where the
amount of the lien sought to be enforced, exclusive of interest, does
not exceed $15,000.
(k) Of actions for the enforcement of liens of owners of facilities
for storage, where the amount of the lien sought to be enforced,
exclusive of interest, does not exceed $15,000.
(l) In actions for a civil penalty imposed for a violation of
NRS 484D.680.
(m) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, in any
action for the issuance of a temporary or extended order for
protection against domestic violence pursuant to NRS 33.020. A
justice court does not have jurisdiction in an action for the issuance
of a temporary or extended order for protection against domestic
violence:
(1) In a county whose population is 100,000 or more and less
than 700,000;
(2) In any township whose population is 100,000 or more
located within a county whose population is 700,000 or more;
(3) If a district court issues a written order to the justice court
requiring that further proceedings relating to the action for the
issuance of the order for protection be conducted before the district
court; or
(4) Where the adverse party against whom the order is
sought is under 18 years of age.
(n) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, in any action
for the issuance of an emergency or extended order for protection
against high-risk behavior pursuant to NRS 33.570 or 33.580. A
justice court does not have jurisdiction in an action for the issuance
of an emergency or extended order for protection against high-risk
behavior:
(1) In a county whose population is 100,000 or more but less
than 700,000;
(2) In any township whose population is 100,000 or more
located within a county whose population is 700,000 or more;
(3) If a district court issues a written order to the justice court
requiring that further proceedings relating to the action for the
issuance of the order for protection be conducted before the district
court; or
(4) Where the adverse party against whom the order is
sought is under 18 years of age.
(o) In an action for the issuance of a temporary or extended
order for protection against harassment in the workplace pursuant to
-
*SB104_R3*

– 21 –
NRS 33.200 to 33.360, inclusive, where the adverse party against
whom the order is sought is 18 years of age or older.
(p) In small claims actions under the provisions of chapter 73 of
NRS.
(q) In actions to contest the validity of liens on mobile homes or
manufactured homes.
(r) In any action pursuant to NRS 200.591 for the issuance of a
protective order against a person alleged to be committing the crime
of stalking, aggravated stalking or harassment where the adverse
party against whom the order is sought is 18 years of age or older.
(s) In any action pursuant to NRS 200.378 for the issuance of a
protective order against a person alleged to have committed the
crime of sexual assault where the adverse party against whom the
order is sought is 18 years of age or older.
(t) In actions transferred from the district court pursuant to
NRS 3.221.
(u) In any action for the issuance of a temporary or extended
order pursuant to NRS 33.400.
(v) In any action seeking an order pursuant to NRS 441A.195.
(w) In any action to determine whether a person has committed
a civil infraction punishable pursuant to NRS 484A.703 to
484A.705, inclusive. Upon approval of the district court or juvenile
court, as applicable, the justice court may transfer original
jurisdiction of a civil infraction punishable pursuant to NRS
484A.703 to 484A.705, inclusive, to the district court or juvenile
court, as applicable, if the person charged with the civil infraction
is a person under 18 years of age.
2. The jurisdiction conferred by this section does not extend to
civil actions, other than for forcible entry or detainer, in which the
title of real property or mining claims or questions affecting the
boundaries of land are involved.
3. Justice courts have jurisdiction of all misdemeanors and no
other criminal offenses except as otherwise provided by specific
statute. Upon approval of the district court, a justice court may
transfer original jurisdiction of a misdemeanor to the district court
for the purpose of assigning an offender to a program established
pursuant to NRS 176A.250 or, if the justice court has not
established a program pursuant to NRS 176A.280, to a program
established pursuant to that section.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 5, 6 and 7, in
criminal cases the jurisdiction of justices of the peace extends to the
limits of their respective counties.
5. A justice of the peace may conduct a pretrial release hearing
for a person located outside of the township of the justice of the
peace.
-
*SB104_R3*

– 22 –
6. In the case of any arrest made by a member of the Nevada
Highway Patrol, the jurisdiction of the justices of the peace extends
to the limits of their respective counties and to the limits of all
counties which have common boundaries with their respective
counties.
7. Each justice court has jurisdiction of any violation of a
regulation governing vehicular traffic on an airport within the
township in which the court is established.
Sec. 2.7. Chapter 41 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
A prosecuting attorney who prosecutes a person charged with a
civil infraction or a violation of a traffic ordinance that is
punishable by imposition of a civil penalty is immune from
liability to the same extent as a prosecuting attorney who
prosecutes a person charged with violating a criminal law of this
State.
Sec. 2.72. NRS 41.0307 is hereby amended to read as follows:
41.0307 As used in NRS 41.0305 to 41.039, inclusive [:] , and
section 2.7 of this act:
1. “Employee” includes an employee of a:
(a) Part-time or full-time board, commission or similar body of
the State or a political subdivision of the State which is created by
law.
(b) Charter school.
(c) University school for profoundly gifted pupils described in
chapter 388C of NRS.
2. “Employment” includes any services performed by an
immune contractor.
3. “Immune contractor” means any natural person, professional
corporation or professional association which:
(a) Is an independent contractor with the State pursuant to NRS
333.700; and
(b) Contracts to provide medical services for the Department of
Corrections.
 As used in this subsection, “professional corporation” and
“professional association” have the meanings ascribed to them in
NRS 89.020.
4. “Public officer” or “officer” includes:
(a) A member of a part-time or full-time board, commission or
similar body of the State or a political subdivision of the State which
is created by law.
(b) A public defender and any deputy or assistant attorney of a
public defender or an attorney appointed to defend a person for a
limited duration with limited jurisdiction.
-
*SB104_R3*

– 23 –
(c) A district attorney and any deputy or assistant district
attorney or an attorney appointed to prosecute a person for a limited
duration with limited jurisdiction.
Sec. 2.74. NRS 41.031 is hereby amended to read as follows:
41.031 1. The State of Nevada hereby waives its immunity
from liability and action and hereby consents to have its liability
determined in accordance with the same rules of law as are applied
to civil actions against natural persons and corporations, except as
otherwise provided in NRS 41.032 to 41.038, inclusive, and section
2.7 of this act, 485.318, subsection 3 and any statute which
expressly provides for governmental immunity, if the claimant
complies with the limitations of NRS 41.010 or the limitations of
NRS 41.032 to 41.036, inclusive. The State of Nevada further
waives the immunity from liability and action of all political
subdivisions of the State, and their liability must be determined in
the same manner, except as otherwise provided in NRS 41.032 to
41.038, inclusive, and section 2.7 of this act, subsection 3 and any
statute which expressly provides for governmental immunity, if the
claimant complies with the limitations of NRS 41.032 to 41.036,
inclusive.
2. An action may be brought under this section against the
State of Nevada or any political subdivision of the State. In any
action against the State of Nevada, the action must be brought in the
name of the State of Nevada on relation of the particular
department, commission, board or other agency of the State whose
actions are the basis for the suit. An action against the State of
Nevada must be filed in the county where the cause or some part
thereof arose or in Carson City. In an action against the State of
Nevada, the summons and a copy of the complaint must be served
upon:
(a) The Attorney General, or a person designated by the
Attorney General, at the Office of the Attorney General in Carson
City; and
(b) The person serving in the office of administrative head of the
named agency.
3. The State of Nevada does not waive its immunity from suit
conferred by Amendment XI of the Constitution of the United
States.
Sec. 2.76. NRS 62B.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
62B.330 1. Except as otherwise provided in this title, the
juvenile court has exclusive original jurisdiction over a child living
or found within the county who is alleged or adjudicated to have
committed a delinquent act.
2. For the purposes of this section, a child commits a
delinquent act if the child:
-
*SB104_R3*

– 24 –
(a) Violates a county or municipal ordinance other than those:
(1) Specified in paragraph (f) or (g) of subsection 1 of
NRS 62B.320;
(2) Concerning an offense related to tobacco; or
(3) Relating to the consumption or possession of alcohol or
the possession of 1 ounce or less of marijuana that are punishable
pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 62E.173.
(b) Violates any rule or regulation having the force of law; or
(c) Commits an act designated a criminal offense pursuant to the
laws of the State of Nevada.
3. [For] Except as otherwise provided in NRS 4.370, for the
purposes of this section, each of the following acts shall be deemed
not to be a delinquent act, and the juvenile court does not have
jurisdiction over a person who is charged with committing such an
act:
(a) Murder or attempted murder and any other related offense
arising out of the same facts as the murder or attempted murder,
regardless of the nature of the related offense, if the person was 16
years of age or older when the murder or attempted murder was
committed.
(b) A felony resulting in death or substantial bodily harm to the
victim and any other related offense arising out of the same facts as
the felony, regardless of the nature of the related offense, if:
(1) The felony was committed on the property of a public or
private school when pupils or employees of the school were present
or may have been present, at an activity sponsored by a public or
private school or on a school bus while the bus was engaged in its
official duties; and
(2) The person intended to create a great risk of death or
substantial bodily harm to more than one person by means of a
weapon, device or course of action that would normally be
hazardous to the lives of more than one person.
(c) A category A or B felony and any other related offense
arising out of the same facts as the category A or B felony,
regardless of the nature of the related offense, if the person was at
least 16 years of age but less than 18 years of age when the offense
was committed, and:
(1) The person is not identified by law enforcement as
having committed the offense and charged before the person is at
least 20 years, 3 months of age, but less than 21 years of age; or
(2) The person is not identified by law enforcement as
having committed the offense until the person reaches 21 years of
age.
-
*SB104_R3*

– 25 –
(d) A violation of a provision of chapters 483 to 484E,
inclusive, 486 or 490 of NRS that is punishable as a civil
infraction pursuant to NRS 484A.703 to 484A.705, inclusive.
(e) Any other offense if, before the offense was committed, the
person previously had been convicted of a criminal offense.
Sec. 2.8. NRS 244.3575 is hereby amended to read as follows:
244.3575 A board of county commissioners may by ordinance
provide that [the] :
1. The violation of a specific ordinance regulating parking
imposes a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed $155, instead of
a criminal sanction.
2. A violation of a traffic ordinance enacted by the board of
county commissioners pursuant to NRS 484A.400 imposes a civil
penalty in an amount not to exceed $500, instead of a criminal
sanction.
Sec. 2.9. On or before July 1, 2024, the Department of Public
Safety, in consultation with law enforcement agencies and courts of
this State, shall:
1. Study uniform civil infraction citations used in different
states to determine best practices for developing and implementing a
standardized, statewide uniform civil infraction citation in this State
that may be issued through the electronic traffic citation system
developed pursuant to NRS 484B.830; and
2. Submit its findings and any recommendations for legislation
resulting from the study to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on
the Judiciary.
Sec. 2.95. On or before January 1, 2024, the justice courts and
municipal courts in this State shall adopt rules governing the
practice and procedure for setting aside a default judgment entered
in an action initiated pursuant to NRS 484A.703 to 484A.705,
inclusive.
Sec. 3. 1. If, on or after the effective date of this act, a person
is subject to:
(a) A suspension of his or her driver’s license pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 3 of NRS 484A.7047; or
(b) A court order delaying the issuance of a driver’s license
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 3 of NRS 484A.7047,
 as that section existed before the effective date of this act, the
Department of Motor Vehicles shall immediately reinstate the
driver’s license of the person or the ability of the person to apply for
the issuance of a driver’s license, as applicable, and shall notify the
person, as soon as possible, of the reinstatement of his or her
driver’s license or ability to apply for the issuance of a driver’s
license, as applicable.
-
*SB104_R3*

– 26 –
2. The Department of Motor Vehicles may not:
(a) Charge any fee for the reinstatement of the driver’s license of
a person in accordance with this section; or
(b) Require a person to undergo any physical or mental
examination pursuant to NRS 483.330 or 483.495 to be eligible for
reinstatement of his or her driver’s license.
Sec. 4. The amendatory provisions of this act apply to offenses
committed before, on or after the effective date of this act.
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*SB104_R3*